Hawaii statutes.
§425-155 Status as limited liability
partnership; cancellation. (a) The status of a partnership as a limited
liability partnership shall be effective upon the filing of the statement of
qualification.

(b) Status as a limited liability
partnership shall continue, regardless of changes in the partnership, until
canceled pursuant to section 425-14, revoked pursuant to section 425-164, or
voluntarily canceled pursuant to section 425-154. Cancellation of a statement
of qualification shall be effective upon filing.

(c) The status of a partnership as a limited
liability partnership and the liability of its partners shall not be affected
by errors in or amendments made to the information required to be contained in
the statement of qualification under section 425-153. [L 2000, c 218, pt of §1;
am L 2001, c 241, §3]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next